North Carolina statutes. Chapter 7B. Juvenile Code.
Article 9. Dispositions.
§ 7B-904.
Authority over parents of juvenile adjudicated as abused, neglected, or dependent.

If the court orders medical, surgical, psychiatric, psychological, or other treatment pursuant to

G.S. 7B-903

, the court may order the parent or other responsible parties to pay the cost of the treatment or care ordered.

At the dispositional hearing or a subsequent hearing if the court finds that it is in the best interests of the juvenile for the parent, guardian, custodian, stepparent, adult member of the juvenile’s household, or adult entrusted with the juvenile’s care to be directly involved in the juvenile’s treatment, the court may order the parent, guardian, custodian, stepparent, adult member of the juvenile’s household, or adult entrusted with the juvenile’s care to participate in medical, psychiatric, psychological, or other treatment of the juvenile. The cost of the treatment shall be paid pursuant to

G.S. 7B-903

.

At the dispositional hearing or a subsequent hearing the court may determine whether the best interests of the juvenile require that the parent, guardian, custodian, stepparent, adult member of the juvenile’s household, or adult entrusted with the juvenile’s care undergo psychiatric, psychological, or other treatment or counseling directed toward remediating or remedying behaviors or conditions that led to or contributed to the juvenile’s adjudication or to the court’s decision to remove custody of the juvenile from the parent, guardian, custodian, stepparent, adult member of the juvenile’s household, or adult entrusted with the juvenile’s care. If the court finds that the best interests of the juvenile require the parent, guardian, custodian, stepparent, adult member of the juvenile’s household, or adult entrusted with the juvenile’s care undergo treatment, it may order that individual to comply with a plan of treatment approved by the court or condition legal custody or physical placement of the juvenile with the parent, guardian, custodian, stepparent, adult member of the juvenile’s household, or adult entrusted with the juvenile’s care upon that individual’s compliance with the plan of treatment. The court may order the parent, guardian, custodian, stepparent, adult member of the juvenile’s household, or adult entrusted with the juvenile’s care to pay the cost of treatment ordered pursuant to this subsection. In cases in which the court has conditioned legal custody or physical placement of the juvenile with the parent, guardian, custodian, stepparent, adult member of the juvenile’s household, or adult entrusted with the juvenile’s care upon compliance with a plan of treatment, the court may charge the cost of the treatment to the county of the juvenile’s residence if the court finds the parent, guardian, custodian, stepparent, adult member of the juvenile’s household, or adult entrusted with the juvenile’s care is unable to pay the cost of the treatment. In all other cases, if the court finds the parent, guardian, custodian, stepparent, adult member of the juvenile’s household, or adult entrusted with the juvenile’s care is unable to pay the cost of the treatment ordered pursuant to this subsection, the court may order that individual to receive treatment currently available from the area mental health program that serves the parent’s catchment area.

(c1)

If the court has ordered an individual to comply with a plan of treatment for substance use disorder, including opioid dependency, that individual shall not be in violation of the terms or conditions of that part of the court’s order if he or she is compliant with medication-assisted treatment. For the purposes of this subsection, “medication-assisted treatment” means the use of pharmacological medications administered, dispensed, and prescribed in a Substance Abuse and Mental Health Services Administration (SAMHSA) accredited and certified opioid treatment program (OTP) or by a certified practitioner licensed in this State to practice medicine, in combination with counseling and behavioral therapies, to provide a whole patient approach to the treatment of substance use disorders.

At the dispositional hearing or a subsequent hearing, when legal custody of a juvenile is vested in someone other than the juvenile’s parent, if the court finds that the parent is able to do so, the court may order that the parent pay a reasonable sum that will cover, in whole or in part, the support of the juvenile after the order is entered. If the court requires the payment of child support, the amount of the payments shall be determined as provided in G.S. 50-13.4(c). If the court places a juvenile in the custody of a county department of social services and if the court finds that the parent is unable to pay the cost of the support required by the juvenile, the cost shall be paid by the county department of social services in whose custody the juvenile is placed, provided the juvenile is not receiving care in an institution owned or operated by the State or federal government or any subdivision thereof.

(d1)

At the dispositional hearing or a subsequent hearing, the court may order the parent, guardian, custodian, or caretaker served with a copy of the summons pursuant to

G.S. 7B-407

to do any of the following:

Attend and participate in parental responsibility classes if those classes are available in the judicial district in which the parent, guardian, custodian, or caretaker resides.

Provide, to the extent that person is able to do so, transportation for the juvenile to keep appointments for medical, psychiatric, psychological, or other treatment ordered by the court if the juvenile remains in or is returned to the home.

Take appropriate steps to remedy conditions in the home that led to or contributed to the juvenile’s adjudication or to the court’s decision to remove custody of the juvenile from the parent, guardian, custodian, or caretaker.

Upon motion of a party or upon the court’s own motion, the court may issue an order directing the parent, guardian, custodian, or caretaker served with a copy of the summons pursuant to

G.S. 7B-407

to appear and show cause why the parent, guardian, custodian, or caretaker should not be found or held in civil or criminal contempt for willfully failing to comply with an order of the court. Chapter 5A of the General Statutes shall govern contempt proceedings initiated pursuant to this section.

History.

1979, c. 815, s. 1; 1983, c. 837, ss. 2, 3; 1987, c. 598, s. 2; 1989, c. 218; c. 529, s. 7; 1995, c. 328, s. 2; 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 609, s. 4; 1997-456, s. 1; 1998-202, s. 6; 1999-318, s. 7; 1999-456, s. 60; 2001-208, s. 3; 2001-487, s. 101; 2021-100, s. 7.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2021-100, s. 7, effective October 1, 2021, in subsections (b), and (c), substituted “adult entrusted” for “adult relative entrusted” throughout; and added subsection (c1).

Construction In Relation to Termination. —

Many of the following cases were decided prior to the enactment of this Chapter.G.S. 7B-904(d1)(3) and

G.S. 7B-906.1

appear to contemplate an ongoing examination of the circumstances that surrounded the juvenile’s removal from the home and the steps that need to be taken in order to remediate both the direct and the indirect underlying causes of the juvenile’s removal from the parental home’ the “conditions of removal” contemplated by G.S. 7B-1111(a)(2) include all of the factors that directly or indirectly contributed to causing the juvenile’s removal from the parental home.
In re B.O.A.,

372 N.C. 372

, 831 S.E.2d 305, 2019

N.C. LEXIS 789

(2019).

Authority of the Court. —

The trial court did not have authority, pursuant to this section, to order respondent to “secure and maintain safe, stable housing and employment” nor to contact a child support enforcement department. This section is the trial court’s only source of authority over the parent of a juvenile adjudicated abused or neglected, and the trial court may not order a parent to undergo any course of conduct not provided for in the statute. In re Cogdill, 137 N.C. App. 504, 528 S.E.2d 600,

2000 N.C. App. LEXIS 425

(2000).

Pursuant to G.S. 7B-904(d1)(3), a trial court did not exceed its authority in ordering the mother to comply with its directive that the father not have any contact with the son, as the infant had suffered a severe head trauma while in the father’s sole care, which could not have been attributed to the infant’s having rolled off the couch, as the father claimed. In re J.A.G., 172 N.C. App. 708, 617 S.E.2d 325,

2005 N.C. App. LEXIS 1785

(2005).

Trial court erred in ordering a father to contact the Child Support Enforcement Agency and to pay child support for the benefit of the children as G.S. 7B-904(d) did not provide the trial court with authority to order the father to contact a child support enforcement authority. In re A.S., 181 N.C. App. 706, 640 S.E.2d 817,

2007 N.C. App. LEXIS 378

, aff'd,

361 N.C. 686

, 651 S.E.2d 883, 2007

N.C. LEXIS 1100

(2007).

Trial court had subject matter jurisdiction under

G.S. 7B-200(a)

over neglect proceedings, and as

G.S. 7B-903

authorized the placement of the neglected child with the child’s mother, the trial court had authority under

G.S. 7B-904

to order a father to pay child support to the child’s mother; however, further findings were required under

G.S. 7B-904

(d) and G.S. 50-13.4(c) as to the reasonable needs of the child and the relative ability of the father to provide that amount. In re W.V., 204 N.C. App. 290, 693 S.E.2d 383,

2010 N.C. App. LEXIS 949

(2010).

Trial court erred in ordering a father to obtain and maintain stable employment under

G.S. 7B-904

as nothing suggested that the father’s employment situation, or lack thereof, led to or contributed to the juvenile’s adjudication as a neglected child. In re W.V., 204 N.C. App. 290, 693 S.E.2d 383,

2010 N.C. App. LEXIS 949

(2010).

In a case in which the district court properly determined that the younger child was abused and that both children were neglected, the district court lacked the authority to order the mother to maintain stable housing and employment because nothing in the district court’s findings of fact suggested that the mother’s lack of employment or unstable housing contributed to the children’s removal from her custody as the primary factors which led to the removal of the children in November 2013 were the mother’s inability to provide proper care and discipline for the children, in that she abused the younger child and neglected both children. In re H.H., 237 N.C. App. 431, 767 S.E.2d 347,

2014 N.C. App. LEXIS 1215

(2014).

Court’s dispositional order requiring a child’s father to maintain steady employment and obtain a domestic violence assessment and follow the assessment’s recommendations did not exceed the court’s authority because there was a nexus between the order’s requirements and the reasons for the child’s removal from the father’s custody. In re T.N.G., 244 N.C. App. 398, 781 S.E.2d 93,

2015 N.C. App. LEXIS 1041

(2015).

Trial court in ceasing reunification exercised its discretion in choosing to decline enumerating specific requirements for a parent and did not abuse its discretion in doing so. The parent was aware of and attempting to participate in an Out of Home Family Services Agreement at the time of the hearing, and any injury caused by the trial court’s decision to not lay out the specific acts required of the parent was harmless. In re E.A.C., 2021-NCCOA-298, 2021- NCCOA-298,

2021 N.C. App. LEXIS 306

(N.C. Ct. App. July 6, 2021).

Trial Judge’s Authority. —

General Assembly clearly contemplated that, in the event that a juvenile is found to have been abused, neglected, or dependent, the trial judge has the authority to order a parent to take any step needed to remediate the conditions that “led to or contributed to” either the juvenile’s adjudication or the decision to divest the parent of custody. In re B.O.A.,

372 N.C. 372

, 831 S.E.2d 305, 2019

N.C. LEXIS 789

(2019).

Participation of Parent in Assessment or Treatment. —

Former G.S. 7A-650(b1) only authorizes the district court to order the parent of a juvenile adjudicated as delinquent, undisciplined, abused, neglected, or dependent to participate in medical, psychiatric, psychological or other treatment ordered for the juvenile pursuant to former G.S. 7A-647(3). Former G.S. 7A-650(b1) does not authorize the court to order a juvenile’s parent to otherwise submit to medical, psychiatric, psychological or other assessment or treatment. In re Badzinski, 79 N.C. App. 250, 339 S.E.2d 80,

1986 N.C. App. LEXIS 1980

(1986).

Former G.S. 7A-650(b1) of this section does not authorize a court to order a parent of a juvenile who has been adjudicated as dependent or neglected to submit to medical, psychiatric, psychological or other assessment or treatment. In re Evans, 81 N.C. App. 449, 344 S.E.2d 325,

1986 N.C. App. LEXIS 2310

(1986).

Trial court properly ordered a father to undergo a psychological evaluation, have a substance abuse assessment, and enroll in parenting classes, as it was in the children’s best interest. In re A.S., 181 N.C. App. 706, 640 S.E.2d 817,

2007 N.C. App. LEXIS 378

, aff'd,

361 N.C. 686

, 651 S.E.2d 883, 2007

N.C. LEXIS 1100

(2007).

The trial court properly ordered respondent to undergo a psychological evaluation and possible treatment

where the evidence indicated that she knew that her daughter was being abused by her father and lied about it. In re Cogdill, 137 N.C. App. 504, 528 S.E.2d 600,

2000 N.C. App. LEXIS 425

(2000).

The determination of reunification requirements

is a conclusion of law because it requires the application of legal principles pursuant to former G.S. 7A-650(b2); appellate review of a trial court’s conclusions of law is limited to whether they are supported by findings of fact. In re Helms, 127 N.C. App. 505, 491 S.E.2d 672,

1997 N.C. App. LEXIS 1061

(1997).

Support payments ordered pursuant to former G.S. 7A-650(c)

should be based on the interplay of the trial court’s conclusions as to the amount of support necessary to meet the needs of the child and the ability of the parents to provide that amount. The court’s conclusions should in turn be based on findings of fact sufficiently specific to show that the court gave due regard to the relevant factors in G.S. 50-13.4(c) and any other relevant factors of the particular case. When such findings are not made, the order should be vacated, because appellate courts have no means of determining whether the order is supported by the evidence and is based on the proper considerations. In re Botsford, 75 N.C. App. 72, 330 S.E.2d 23,

1985 N.C. App. LEXIS 3613

(1985).

Conditions Imposed on Parents Were Reasonable. —

Conditions imposed on the parents of the neglected children who were removed due to domestic violence were reasonably related to aiding the parents in remedying the conditions which led to the children’s removal where the parents were required to comply with the recommendations of mental health professional, medical professionals supplying prescription medications, substance abuse evaluations, drug screens and the child medical evaluation, and provide copies of deeds or leases, and employment or income records. In re A.R., 227 N.C. App. 518, 742 S.E.2d 629,

2013 N.C. App. LEXIS 608

(2013).

Trial court did not err by ordering the mother to show proof of income because it was reasonably related to ensure that the children had adequate care and supervision as the condition that led to their adjudication was lack of care and supervision. In re W.C.T., 2021-NCCOA-559, 280 N.C. App. 17, 867 S.E.2d 14, 2021- NCCOA-559,

2021 N.C. App. LEXIS 580

(2021).

Trial court did not err by ordering the mother to refrain from allowing mental health to impact her parenting because it bore relationship to her children’s removal from her home, as the trial court found that the mother had conspired with the father and the paternal grandmother to develop a completely false narrative about the child’s injuries and the mother promulgated a false narrative about her toddler child being at fault for for the older child’s burns. In re W.C.T., 2021-NCCOA-559, 280 N.C. App. 17, 867 S.E.2d 14, 2021- NCCOA-559,

2021 N.C. App. LEXIS 580

(2021).

§ 7B-905.
Dispositional order.

The dispositional order shall be in writing, signed, and entered no later than 30 days from the completion of the hearing, and shall contain appropriate findings of fact and conclusions of law. The court shall state with particularity, both orally and in the written order of disposition, the precise terms of the disposition including the kind, duration, and the person who is responsible for carrying out the disposition and the person or agency in whom custody is vested. If the order is not entered within 30 days following completion of the hearing, the clerk of court for juvenile matters shall schedule a subsequent hearing at the first session of court scheduled for the hearing of juvenile matters following the 30-day period to determine and explain the reason for the delay and to obtain any needed clarification as to the contents of the order. The order shall be entered within 10 days of the subsequent hearing required by this subsection.

Repealed by Session Laws 2021-100, s. 8, effective October 1, 2021, and repealed by Session Laws 2021-132, s. 1(j), effective October 1, 2021, and applicable to actions filed or pending on or after that date.

, (d) Repealed by Session Laws 2015-136, s. 12, effective October 1, 2015, and applicable to actions filed or pending on or after that date.

History.

1979, c. 815, s. 1; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1090, s. 10; 1991, c. 434, s. 1; 1997-390, s. 8; 1998-202, s. 6; 1998-229, s. 24; 1999-456, s. 60; 2001-208, ss. 4, 18; 2001-487, s. 101; 2005-398, s. 5; 2011-295, s. 9; 2013-129, s. 23; 2015-136, s. 12; 2021-100, s. 8; 2021-132, s. 1(j).

§ 7B-905.1.
Visitation.

An order that removes custody of a juvenile from a parent, guardian, or custodian or that continues the juvenile’s placement outside the home shall provide for visitation that is in the best interests of the juvenile consistent with the juvenile’s health and safety, including no visitation. The court may specify in the order conditions under which visitation may be suspended.

If the juvenile is placed or continued in the custody or placement responsibility of a county department of social services, the court may order the director to arrange, facilitate, and supervise a visitation plan expressly approved or ordered by the court. The plan shall indicate the minimum frequency and length of visits and whether the visits shall be supervised. Unless the court orders otherwise, the director shall have discretion to determine who will supervise visits when supervision is required, to determine the location of visits, and to change the day and time of visits in response to scheduling conflicts, illness of the child or party, or extraordinary circumstances. The director shall promptly communicate a limited and temporary change in the visitation schedule to the affected party. Any ongoing change in the visitation schedule shall be communicated to the party in writing and state the reason for the change.If the director makes a good faith determination that the visitation plan is not consistent with the juvenile’s health and safety, the director may temporarily suspend all or part of the visitation plan. The director shall not be subject to any motion to show cause for this suspension but shall expeditiously file a motion for review and request that a hearing be scheduled within 30 days. However, no motion or notice of hearing is required if a review or permanency planning hearing is already scheduled to be heard within 30 days of the suspension.

(b1)

When visitation, whether supervised or unsupervised, is ordered between a juvenile who is placed in or continued in the custody or placement responsibility of a county department of social services and a parent, a parent’s positive result from a drug screen alone is insufficient to deny the parent court-ordered visitation with the juvenile. For parents with unsupervised visitation that have a positive result from a drug screen, the department of social services shall expeditiously file a motion for review and request that a hearing be scheduled within 30 days for the court to review the visitation plan to ensure the safety of the child. While the motion is pending, the director may temporarily impose supervision requirements to all or part of the visitation plan. The director shall promptly communicate the limited and temporary change in the visitation plan to the affected party. Nothing in this subsection prevents a visit from being cancelled if, at the time that visitation between the parent and the juvenile occurs, a parent is under the influence of drugs or alcohol and exhibits behavior that may create an unsafe environment for a child, or the parent appears to be actively impaired.

If the juvenile is placed or continued in the custody or guardianship of a relative or other suitable person, any order providing for visitation shall specify the minimum frequency and length of the visits and whether the visits shall be supervised. The court may authorize additional visitation as agreed upon by the respondent and custodian or guardian.

If the court waives permanency planning hearings and retains jurisdiction, all parties shall be informed of the right to file a motion for review of any visitation plan entered pursuant to this section. Upon motion of any party and after proper notice and a hearing, the court may establish, modify, or enforce a visitation plan that is in the juvenile’s best interest. Prior to or at the hearing, the court may order the department and guardian ad litem to investigate and make written recommendations as to appropriate visitation and give testimony concerning its recommendations. For resolution of issues related to visitation, the court may order the parents, guardian, or custodian to participate in custody mediation where there is a program established pursuant to

G.S. 7A-494

. In referring a case to custody mediation, the court shall specify the issue or issues for mediation, including, but not limited to, whether or not visitation shall be supervised and whether overnight visitation may occur. Custody mediation shall not permit the participants to consent to a change in custody. A copy of any agreement reached in custody mediation shall be provided to all parties and counsel and shall be approved by the court. The provisions of

G.S. 50-13.1(d)

through (f) apply to this section.

History.

2013-129, s. 24; 2019-33, s. 9; 2021-100, s. 9; 2021-132, s. 1(g).

§ 7B-906.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2013-129, s. 25, effective October 1, 2013, and applicable to actions filed or pending on or after that date.

History.

1979, c. 815, s. 1; 1987, c. 810; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1090, s. 11; 1989, c. 152, s. 1; 1997-390, s. 9; 1998-202, s. 6; 1998-229, ss. 8, 25; 1999-456, s. 60; 2000-124, s. 2; 2001-208, s. 19; 2001-487, s. 101; 2003-62, s. 2; 2003-140, s. 9(c); 2005-398, s. 6; 2007-276, s. 3; 2009-311, s. 6; repealed by 2013-129, s. 25, effective October 1, 2013.

§ 7B-906.1.
Review and permanency planning hearings.

The court shall conduct a review or permanency planning hearing within 90 days from the date of the initial dispositional hearing held pursuant to

G.S. 7B-901

. Review or permanency planning hearings shall be held at least every six months thereafter. If custody has not been removed from a parent, guardian, caretaker, or custodian, the hearing shall be designated as a review hearing. If custody has been removed from a parent, guardian, or custodian, the hearing shall be designated as permanency planning hearing.

The director of social services shall make a timely request to the clerk to calendar each hearing at a session of court scheduled for the hearing of juvenile matters. The clerk shall give 15 days’ notice of the hearing and its purpose to (i) the parents, (ii) the juvenile if 12 years of age or more, (iii) the guardian, (iv) the person providing care for the juvenile, (v) the custodian or agency with custody, (vi) the guardian ad litem, and (vii) any other person or agency the court may specify. The department of social services shall either provide to the clerk the name and address of the person providing care for the juvenile for notice under this subsection or file written documentation with the clerk that the juvenile’s current care provider was sent notice of hearing. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to make the person providing care for the juvenile a party to the proceeding solely based on receiving notice and the right to be heard.

At each hearing, the court shall consider information from the parents, the juvenile, the guardian, any person with whom the juvenile is placed, the custodian or agency with custody, the guardian ad litem, and any other person or agency that will aid in the court’s review. The court shall provide any person with whom the child is placed the opportunity to address the court regarding the juvenile’s well-being. The court may consider any evidence, including hearsay evidence as defined in

G.S. 8C-1

, Rule 801, or testimony or evidence from any person that is not a party, that the court finds to be relevant, reliable, and necessary to determine the needs of the juvenile and the most appropriate disposition.

At each hearing, the court shall consider the following criteria and make written findings regarding those that are relevant:

Services which have been offered to prevent the removal or reunite the juvenile with either parent whether or not the juvenile resided with the parent at the time of removal or the guardian or custodian from whom the child was removed.

(1a)

Reports on the juvenile’s continuation in the home of the parent, guardian, or custodian; and the appropriateness of the juvenile’s continuation in that home. If the juvenile is removed from the custody of a parent, guardian, or custodian at a review hearing, the court shall schedule a permanency planning hearing within 30 days of the review, unless the hearing was noticed and heard as a permanency planning hearing.

Reports on visitation that has occurred and whether there is a need to create, modify, or enforce an appropriate visitation plan in accordance with

G.S. 7B-905.1

.

Whether efforts to reunite the juvenile with either parent clearly would be unsuccessful or inconsistent with the juvenile’s health or safety and need for a safe, permanent home within a reasonable period of time. The court shall consider efforts to reunite regardless of whether the juvenile resided with the parent, guardian, or custodian at the time of removal.

Reports on the placements the juvenile has had, the appropriateness of the juvenile’s current foster care placement, and the goals of the juvenile’s foster care plan, including the role the current foster parent will play in the planning for the juvenile.

If the juvenile is 16 or 17 years of age, a report on an independent living assessment of the juvenile and, if appropriate, an independent living plan developed for the juvenile.

Repealed by Session Laws 2021-132, s. 1(h), effective October 1, 2021, and applicable to actions filed or pending on or after that date.

Any other criteria the court deems necessary.

(d1)

At any review hearing, the court may maintain the juvenile’s placement under review or order a different placement, appoint an individual guardian of the person pursuant to

G.S. 7B-600

, or order any disposition authorized by

G.S. 7B-903

, including the authority to place the child in the custody of either parent or any relative found by the court to be suitable and found by the court to be in the best interests of the juvenile.

(d2)

Absent extraordinary circumstances, when the parent, guardian, or custodian has successfully completed the court-ordered services and the juvenile is residing in a safe home, the court may waive further review hearings or terminate its jurisdiction in accordance with this subsection or

G.S. 7B-911

.

At any permanency planning hearing where the juvenile is not placed with a parent, the court shall additionally consider the following criteria and make written findings regarding those that are relevant:

Whether it is possible for the juvenile to be placed with a parent within the next six months and, if not, why such placement is not in the juvenile’s best interests.

Where the juvenile’s placement with a parent is unlikely within six months, whether legal guardianship or custody with a relative or some other suitable person should be established and, if so, the rights and responsibilities that should remain with the parents.

Where the juvenile’s placement with a parent is unlikely within six months, whether adoption should be pursued and, if so, any barriers to the juvenile’s adoption, including when and if termination of parental rights should be considered.

Where the juvenile’s placement with a parent is unlikely within six months, whether the juvenile should remain in the current placement, or be placed in another permanent living arrangement and why.

Whether the county department of social services has since the initial permanency plan hearing made reasonable efforts to implement the permanent plan for the juvenile.

Any other criteria the court deems necessary.

In the case of a juvenile who is in the custody or placement responsibility of a county department of social services and has been in placement outside the home for 12 of the most recent 22 months, or a court of competent jurisdiction has determined that the parent (i) has abandoned the child, (ii) has committed murder or voluntary manslaughter of another child of the parent, or (iii) has aided, abetted, attempted, conspired, or solicited to commit murder or voluntary manslaughter of the child or another child of the parent, the director of the department of social services shall initiate a proceeding to terminate the parental rights of the parent unless the court finds any of the following:

The primary permanent plan for the juvenile is guardianship or custody with a relative or some other suitable person.

The court makes specific findings as to why the filing of a petition for termination of parental rights is not in the best interests of the child.

The department of social services has not provided the juvenile’s family with services the department deems necessary when reasonable efforts are still required to enable the juvenile’s return to a safe home.

At the conclusion of each permanency planning hearing, the court shall make specific findings as to the best permanent plans to achieve a safe, permanent home for the juvenile within a reasonable period of time.

The order shall be reduced to writing, signed, and entered no later than 30 days following the completion of the hearing. If the order is not entered within 30 days following completion of the hearing, the clerk of court for juvenile matters shall schedule a subsequent hearing at the first session of court scheduled for the hearing of juvenile matters following the 30-day period to determine and explain the reason for the delay and to obtain any needed clarification as to the contents of the order. The order shall be entered within 10 days of the subsequent hearing required by this subsection.

The court may maintain the juvenile’s placement under review or order a different placement, appoint a guardian of the person for the juvenile pursuant to

G.S. 7B-600

, or order any disposition authorized by

G.S. 7B-903

, including the authority to place the child in the custody of either parent or any relative found by the court to be suitable and found by the court to be in the best interests of the juvenile.

If the court determines that the juvenile shall be placed in the custody of an individual other than a parent or appoints an individual guardian of the person pursuant to

G.S. 7B-600

, the court shall verify that the person receiving custody or being appointed as guardian of the juvenile understands the legal significance of the placement or appointment and will have adequate resources to care appropriately for the juvenile. The fact that the prospective custodian or guardian has provided a stable placement for the juvenile for at least six consecutive months is evidence that the person has adequate resources.

If at any time a juvenile has been removed from a parent and legal custody is awarded to either parent or findings are made in accordance with subsection (n) of this section, the court shall be relieved of the duty to conduct periodic judicial reviews of the placement.

(k1)

The court shall not waive or refuse to conduct a review hearing if a party files a motion seeking the review hearing and alleges a significant fact.

If the court continues the juvenile’s placement in the custody or placement responsibility of a county department of social services, the provisions of

G.S. 7B-903.1

shall apply to any order entered under this section.

If the court finds that a proceeding to terminate the parental rights of the juvenile’s parents is necessary in order to perfect the primary permanent plan for the juvenile, the director of the department of social services shall file a petition to terminate parental rights within 60 calendar days from the date of the entry of the order unless the court makes written findings regarding why the petition cannot be filed within 60 days. If the court makes findings to the contrary, the court shall specify the time frame in which any needed petition to terminate parental rights shall be filed.

Notwithstanding other provisions of this Article, the court may waive the holding of hearings required by this section, may require written reports to the court by the agency or person holding custody in lieu of permanency planning hearings, or order that permanency planning hearings be held less often than every six months if the court finds by clear, cogent, and convincing evidence each of the following:

The juvenile has resided in the placement for a period of at least one year or the juvenile has resided in the placement for at least six consecutive months and the court enters a consent order pursuant to G.S. 7B-801(b1).

The placement is stable and continuation of the placement is in the juvenile’s best interests.

Neither the juvenile’s best interests nor the rights of any party require that permanency planning hearings be held every six months.

All parties are aware that the matter may be brought before the court for review at any time by the filing of a motion for review or on the court’s own motion.

The court order has designated the relative or other suitable person as the juvenile’s permanent custodian or guardian of the person.The court may not waive or refuse to conduct a hearing if a party files a motion seeking the hearing. However, if a guardian of the person has been appointed for the juvenile and the court has also made findings in accordance with subsection (n) of this section that guardianship is the permanent plan for the juvenile, the court shall proceed in accordance with G.S. 7B-600(b).

Permanency planning hearings under this section shall be replaced by post termination of parental rights’ placement review hearings when required by

G.S. 7B-908

.

History.

2013-129, s. 26; 2015-136, ss. 13, 17; 2016-94, s. 12C.1(g1); 2017-161, s. 8; 2019-33, s. 10; 2021-100, s. 10; 2021-132, s. 1(h).

§ 7B-906.2.
Permanent plans; concurrent planning.

At any permanency planning hearing pursuant to

G.S. 7B-906.1

, the court shall adopt one or more of the following permanent plans the court finds is in the juvenile’s best interest:

Reunification as defined by

G.S. 7B-101

.

Adoption under Article 3 of Chapter 48 of the General Statutes.

Guardianship pursuant to G.S. 7B-600(b).

Custody to a relative or other suitable person.

Another Planned Permanent Living Arrangement (APPLA) pursuant to

G.S. 7B-912

.

Reinstatement of parental rights pursuant to

G.S. 7B-1114

.

(a1)

Concurrent planning shall continue until a permanent plan is or has been achieved.

At any permanency planning hearing, the court shall adopt concurrent permanent plans and shall identify the primary plan and secondary plan. Reunification shall be a primary or secondary plan unless the court made written findings under G.S. 7B-901(c) or G.S. 7B-906.1(d)(3), the permanent plan is or has been achieved in accordance with subsection (a1) of this section, or the court makes written findings that reunification efforts clearly would be unsuccessful or would be inconsistent with the juvenile’s health or safety. The finding that reunification efforts clearly would be unsuccessful or inconsistent with the juvenile’s health or safety may be made at any permanency planning hearing, and if made, shall eliminate reunification as a plan. Unless permanence has been achieved, the court shall order the county department of social services to make efforts toward finalizing the primary and secondary permanent plans and may specify efforts that are reasonable to timely achieve permanence for the juvenile.

Unless reunification efforts were previously ceased, at each permanency planning hearing the court shall make a finding about whether the reunification efforts of the county department of social services were reasonable. In every subsequent permanency planning hearing held pursuant to

G.S. 7B-906.1

, the court shall make written findings about the efforts the county department of social services has made toward the primary permanent plan and any secondary permanent plans in effect prior to the hearing. The court shall make a conclusion about whether efforts to finalize the permanent plan were reasonable to timely achieve permanence for the juvenile.

At any permanency planning hearing under subsections (b) and (c) of this section, the court shall make written findings as to each of the following, which shall demonstrate the degree of success or failure toward reunification:

Whether the parent is making adequate progress within a reasonable period of time under the plan.

Whether the parent is actively participating in or cooperating with the plan, the department, and the guardian ad litem for the juvenile.

Whether the parent remains available to the court, the department, and the guardian ad litem for the juvenile.

Whether the parent is acting in a manner inconsistent with the health or safety of the juvenile.

If the juvenile is 14 years of age or older, the court shall make written findings in accordance with G.S. 7B-912(a), regardless of the juvenile’s permanent plan.

History.

2015-136, s. 14; 2016-94, s. 12C.1(h); 2019-33, s. 11; 2021-100, s. 11; 2021-132, s. 1(k).

§ 7B-907.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2013-129, s. 25, effective October 1, 2013, and applicable to actions filed or pending on or after that date.

History.

1998-229, ss. 8.1, 25.1; 1999-456, s. 60; 2001-208, ss. 5, 20; 2001-487, s. 101; 2003-62, s. 3; 2003-140, s. 9(d); 2005-398, s. 7; 2007-276, s. 4; 2009-311, s. 7; repealed by 2013-129, s. 25, effective October 1, 2013.